Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Division 1. Commercial Vehicles

§ 31-18-201.
Commercial vehicles; registration; exemptions.

As used in this article:

“Instate miles” means the total number of miles operated by a commercial vehicle or fleet of commercial vehicles in Wyoming during the preceding year and in the case of Wyoming based commercial fleet vehicles may include miles accrued by fleet vehicles in jurisdictions that require no apportionment and grant reciprocity;

“Preceding year” means a period of twelve (12) consecutive months fixed by the commission which shall be within the eighteen (18) months immediately preceding the commencement of the registration year for which registration is sought;

“Reciprocity” means the exemption of a vehicle from registration and payment of Wyoming registration fees;

“Registration year” means the calendar year;

“Total miles” means the total number of miles operated by a commercial vehicle or fleet of commercial vehicles in all jurisdictions during the preceding year;

“Wyoming based commercial vehicle” means a commercial vehicle:

The owner of which maintains an established place of business in Wyoming, the operational records of which are maintained or readily available in Wyoming and mileage of which is accrued in Wyoming; or

Which is most frequently dispatched, garaged, serviced, maintained, operated or otherwise controlled from or in Wyoming.

“Commercial vehicle” means any vehicle or vehicle combination used, designed or maintained for transportation of persons for hire, compensation or profit, or designed or used primarily for the transportation of property for gain or profit and shall include, but not be limited to:

A power unit having two (2) axles and a gross vehicle weight or registered gross vehicle weight exceeding twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds;

A power unit having three (3) or more axles regardless of weight; or

Is used in combination when the weight of such combination exceeds twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds of gross vehicle weight.

Except as otherwise provided by W.S.

31-18-202

and subsections (h) and (j) of this section, every owner of a commercial vehicle or fleet of commercial vehicles shall comply with the requirements for certificates of title contained in W.S.

31-2-101

through

31-2-105

and, for glider kit vehicles, the additional requirements contained in W.S.

31-2-112

, and register and license the vehicle or fleet for operation in Wyoming in accordance with the time requirements contained in W.S. 31-2-201(a)(i) and (ii) as follows:

With the department if an owner of a commercial vehicle or fleet of commercial vehicles which will be operated in Wyoming and any other jurisdiction;

With the county treasurer of the county in which the owner resides or in which the vehicle or fleet is based if a commercial vehicle or fleet of commercial vehicles which will not be proportionally registered for operation in Wyoming and any other jurisdiction.

Applications for registration of commercial vehicles pursuant to this section shall contain the following information and such other information as required by the department:

If registering under paragraph (b)(i) of this section:

Instate miles during the preceding year, or if none, an estimate of instate miles to be accrued by the vehicle or fleet during the registration year;

Total miles during the preceding year, or if none, an estimate of total miles to be accrued by the vehicle or fleet during the registration year;

A description and identification of the vehicle;

Evidence of compliance with W.S.

31-2-101

;

Information required by W.S.

31-2-103

;

A declaration of the gross vehicle weight for each commercial vehicle or combination of commercial vehicles.

If registering under paragraph (b)(ii) of this section, the information required by subparagraphs (c)(i)(C), (D), (E) and (F) of this section. If the commercial vehicle is under twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds gross vehicle weight rating, application shall be made to the department of transportation for the county treasurer to issue commercial license plates.

Applications made pursuant to paragraph (b)(i) of this section shall be accompanied by an administrative fee of six dollars ($6.00) for each motor vehicle, trailer or semitrailer to be registered and an additional fee to be computed as follows:

In the case of a Wyoming based commercial vehicle or fleet, or a commercial vehicle or fleet based in a jurisdiction permitting proportional registration of similar Wyoming based commercial vehicles or fleets which will be operated under intrastate for hire operating authority granted by the department, except trailers, divide instate miles by total miles and multiply times the county fee prescribed by W.S. 31-18-401(a)(i) and the state fee prescribed by W.S. 31-18-401(a)(ii), and an additional fee of fifteen dollars ($15.00) to the counties for each vehicle to be registered;

Except as otherwise provided by paragraph (iii) of this subsection, in the case of a commercial vehicle or fleet based in a jurisdiction permitting proportional registration of similar Wyoming based commercial vehicles or fleets which will not require intrastate for hire operating authority from the department, divide instate miles by total miles and multiply times the equalized highway use tax prescribed by W.S. 31-18-401(a)(iii) and the state fee prescribed by W.S. 31-18-401(a)(ii) for each vehicle to be registered;

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (ii) of this subsection and W.S. 31-18-401(a)(iii) an owner of a commercial vehicle as defined in paragraph (ii) of this subsection may file an application with the department prior to January 1 of the year in which registration is due requesting payment of the proportioned county fee in lieu of the equalized highway use tax prescribed in W.S. 31-18-401(a)(iii). The department shall authorize the taxpayer to pay the lesser of the county registration fee prescribed in W.S. 31-18-401(a)(i) times instate miles divided by total miles or the equalized highway use tax if the department receives the information which is necessary to calculate the county fee and the equalized highway use tax prior to the time prescribed by this paragraph. The department shall notify the taxpayer of the amount due under this paragraph within thirty (30) days of the date the necessary information is received. The taxpayer shall pay the amount due as determined by the department pursuant to this paragraph prior to April 1 of the year in which registration is due. Fees collected pursuant to this paragraph shall be distributed to the state highway fund.

Every owner engaged in the business of renting utility trailers shall register a number of trailers equal to the average number of utility trailers rented in or through Wyoming during the preceding year. Thereafter, all utility trailers rented or leased by the owner and properly identified and licensed in any jurisdiction may operate in Wyoming on an interstate and intrastate basis. The owner shall submit verifiable data to the department as to the average number of trailers rented or operated in Wyoming during the preceding year and such other information as may be required by the department. All applicable fees shall be paid to and, if necessary, license plates issued by the department.

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 128, § 4.

Every owner engaged in the business of renting rental trucks less than twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds gross weight operated as part of an identifiable one-way fleet shall register a number of rental trucks equal to instate miles divided by total miles times the number of rental vehicles in the fleet. Thereafter, all fleet rental trucks may operate in Wyoming on an interstate and intrastate basis. The owner shall submit verifiable data and pay applicable fees to the department. The department shall issue evidence of registration of the fleet.

The department may enter into agreements relating to proportional registration of commercial vehicles with authorities of one (1) or more jurisdictions to facilitate administration. Every agreement shall be in writing and filed in the office of the secretary of state. Every agreement shall contain a provision authorizing the department to cancel and revoke the agreement with respect to Wyoming upon thirty (30) days notice to other parties thereto. Agreements shall provide for the submission of an application containing the information required by subsection (c) of this section to the department in the case of Wyoming based commercial vehicles and to the department or an authorized agency in another jurisdiction, in the case of non-Wyoming based commercial vehicles. As used in this subsection “commercial vehicle” includes utility trailers, rental vehicles and rental trucks.

Agreements may also provide for the following:

Full reciprocity for non-Wyoming based commercial vehicles operated solely in interstate commerce of specified types, or gross or unladen weights, in exchange for equivalent reciprocity for Wyoming based commercial carriers;

Reciprocal audits of records of owners or commercial vehicles by jurisdictions parties to the agreement;

A definition of “fleet” which varies from W.S. 31-1-101(a)(vi);

Such other matters which will facilitate the administration of the agreement, including exchange of information for audits and enforcement activity and collection and disbursement of proportioned registration fees for other jurisdictions in the case of Wyoming based commercial vehicles.

Upon application and payment of fees as prescribed by subsection (d) of this section, the department shall register commercial vehicles and in the case of Wyoming based commercial carriers issue distinctive Wyoming license plates. In the case of non-Wyoming based commercial vehicles the department may issue distinctive Wyoming license plates, distinctive stickers, or other suitable visual identification devices in such form as prescribed by the department which shall be affixed to the vehicle as required by the department. The department may also issue a registration card for each vehicle registered identifying the vehicle which shall be carried in the vehicle at all times. The department shall cancel, revoke, suspend or refuse to issue the registrations provided by this section based upon a finding from its records and prior experience that:

The operation or equipment used renders the highways unsafe;

Delinquent fees are due and payable to the department; or

The permittee has not complied with or continues to not comply with all laws and applicable rules and regulations of this act or governing the operations of interstate motor carriers as defined by law.

Commercial vehicles or fleets registered as provided by this section are fully licensed and registered in Wyoming for any type of movement or operation excluding those instances in which a grant of authority is required for intrastate movement or operation in which case no vehicle shall be operated in intrastate commerce unless the owner or operator has intrastate authority or rights from the department.

If the department determines that mileage records or mileage estimates of any owner are not satisfactory for the purpose of registration under this section, the department may prescribe or permit an alternate method designed to present a more accurate representation of the proportion of the preceding year to be ascribed to the owner’s commercial vehicle or fleet in substitution for the quotient prescribed by subsection (d) of this section. If the department determines that the quotient used for the preceding registration year varies substantially from the quotient submitted for the registration year under application, the department may recompute the quotient for the preceding registration year on the basis of information contained in the application or from the applicant’s records or from such other information as it may have available to it and charge such additional fees as may be required by the redetermined quotient.

Vehicles acquired by an owner after the commencement of the registration year and subsequently added to a proportionally registered fleet shall be proportionally registered by applying the mileage percentage used in the original application for the fleet for the registration period to the fees otherwise due with respect to the vehicle for the remainder of the registration year. This subsection does not apply to any commercial vehicle operated by the owner as a lessee of another owner who has in the registration year proportionally registered the vehicle in Wyoming if the lessor establishes to the satisfaction of the department that he maintains and will submit complete annual mileage data for the vehicle for all jurisdictions, including, by individual jurisdictions, all miles operated in service by the lessor and his lessee and that the vehicle or its replacement will, in the normal course of operations, be included in the lessor’s proportional registration application in Wyoming for the succeeding license year.

If a commercial vehicle is withdrawn from a proportionally registered fleet during any registration year the owner shall so notify the department. The department shall require the owner to surrender proportional registration cards and such other identification devices which have been issued with respect to the vehicle. If a vehicle is permanently withdrawn from a proportionally registered fleet because it has been destroyed, sold or otherwise completely removed from the service of the owner the unused portion of the registration fee paid with respect to the vehicle, which is a sum equal to the amount of registration fee paid with respect to the vehicle for the registration year reduced by one twelfth (1/12) for each calendar month and fraction elapsing between the first day of the month of the registration year and the date the notice of withdrawal is received by the department, shall be credited to the proportional registration account of the owner. The credit shall be applied against liability for subsequent additions to be prorated during the registration year. If the credit is less than five dollars ($5.00) per vehicle withdrawn no credit shall be made or entered. In no event shall the amount be credited against fees other than those for the registration year nor is any amount subject to refund.

Any owner registering a vehicle pursuant to this section shall preserve the records on which the application is based for three (3) years following the registration year for which registration was permitted. Upon request of the department, the owner shall make his records available during reasonable business hours for audit as to accuracy of computations, payments and assessment of deficiencies or allowances for credit. The department may enter into agreements with agencies of other jurisdictions administering motor vehicle registration laws for reciprocal audits of the records of any owner. Audits performed by agencies of other jurisdictions may be accepted and utilized by the department in the same manner as if the audit had been performed by personnel of the department.

Any sums found to be due and owing upon audit bear interest of one and three-quarters percent (1.75%) per month from the date when they should have been paid until the date of actual payment. If the audit discloses a deliberate and willful intent to evade the requirements of this section, an additional penalty of one percent (1%) per month of sums found to be due and owing on audit from the date when they should have been paid shall be also assessed.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, owners of commercial vehicles meeting the registration requirements of another jurisdiction and subject to registration in Wyoming and not entitled to exemption from registration or licensing under this section may, as an alternative to registration or proportional registration secure a temporary permit from the department to make a single trip into, within or out of Wyoming for a period of not to exceed ninety-six (96) hours for a fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) for each single unit operated as a single unit or forty dollars ($40.00) for each legal combination of units including only one (1) power unit. In lieu of the fee required by W.S. 39-17-106(g), 39-17-206(d) or 39-17-306(f) for license and taxation of gasoline, diesel or alternative fuels, the operator may secure a temporary permit from the department to operate in Wyoming for a period of not to exceed ninety-six (96) hours for a fee of seven dollars and fifty cents ($7.50) for each single unit operated as a single unit or fifteen dollars ($15.00) for each legal combination of units including only one (1) power unit.

An owner of a commercial vehicle engaged in the motion picture industry whose vehicle is properly registered in another state and not entitled to the registration or licensing exemption under W.S.

31-2-224

or this section may, as an alternative to registration or proportional registration and in lieu of the fee required by W.S. 39-17-106(g), 39-17-206(d) or 39-17-306(f), apply to the department for a temporary permit to operate the vehicle in Wyoming for ninety (90) days upon payment of the appropriate fees prescribed in subsection (s) of this section. As used in this subsection, “motion picture industry” includes all filming in this state for commercial purposes including advertising. Any person operating a vehicle in Wyoming beyond the period authorized in the temporary permit is subject to a civil penalty requiring full registration of the vehicle in Wyoming for the registration year in which the violation occurred and payment of all fees required for registration.

Any person legally engaged in the transportation of new vehicles over the highways of this state from manufacturing or assembly points to agents of manufacturers or dealers in this state or in other states, territories or foreign countries or provinces by the drive away or tow away methods, where the vehicle being driven, towed on its own wheels, or transported by the saddlemount, towbar or full-mount methods, or a lawful combination of these methods, for the purpose of sale, barter or exchange, or for delivery after sale, may annually apply to the department for a permit and a transporter number plate to use the highways of this state and pay a fee of three hundred dollars ($300.00) for the permit and thirty dollars ($30.00) for each transporter number plate. The transporter plate shall be displayed upon the front of the driven vehicle combination or upon the rear of a motor vehicle driven singly or upon the rear of a vehicle being towed. The permit shall be valid for the current year ending December 31. Vehicles may be transported as provided under this subsection while displaying the plate. Transporters who fail to display the plate will be required to obtain a single trip permit from the department pursuant to subsection (s) of this section.

An operator of a tour bus may obtain a temporary permit pursuant to subsection (s) of this section. An operator of a mobile drilling rig or well servicing unit operated interstate and which is constructed as a machine consisting in general of a mast, an engine for power and propulsion, a draw works and a chassis permanently constructed or assembled for the vehicle may obtain a single trip permit in accordance with subsection (s) of this section. Mobile drilling rigs or well servicing units making an intrastate move shall be registered in Wyoming.

A temporary permit issued under this section shall be carried in the power unit. Unlawful use of the temporary permit or fraudulent or false information given to obtain the temporary permit invalidates the permit and results in the penalty provided by W.S.

31-18-701

. The department shall cancel, revoke, suspend or refuse to issue the temporary permits provided by this section based upon a finding from its records and prior experience that:

The operation or equipment used renders the highways unsafe;

Delinquent fees are due and payable to the department; or

The permittee has not complied with or continues to not comply with all laws and applicable rules and regulations of this act or governing the operations of interstate motor carriers as defined by law.

The following vehicles are exempt from the provisions of this section:

Vehicles granted reciprocity pursuant to W.S.

31-2-203

;

The following vehicles if validly registered in states contiguous to Wyoming if the contiguous states grant similar exemptions to Wyoming owners of like vehicles:

Wreckers or service cars when towing or hauling other vehicles for emergency repairs;

Trucks, or permissible combinations of trucks and trailers, when being used by any farmer or rancher for the transportation of livestock, feed or unprocessed agricultural products owned and produced by the farmer or rancher of production to market, and of farm and ranch supplies solely intended for the use of the farmer or rancher, and not for sale, when being transported on the return trip.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 3; W.S. 1977, §

31-2-202

; Laws 1987, ch. 90, § 1; 1989, ch. 129, §§ 1, 3; 1990, ch. 93, § 2; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 1992, ch. 9, § 1; 1993, ch. 68, § 3; ch. 98, § 1; ch. 175, § 1; 1994, ch. 90, § 2; 1998, ch. 5, § 2; ch. 46, § 1; ch. 51, § 2; 2001, ch. 53, § 1; 2009, ch. 16, § 2; ch. 128, § 4; ch. 183, § 1; 2018 ch. 129, § 2, effective July 1, 2018; 2020 ch. 9, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 65, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2009 amendments. —

The first 2009 amendment, by
Laws 2009, ch. 16, § 2, effective January 1, 2010, substituted “31-2-224” for “31-2-201(d)” in (t).

The second 2009 amendment, by Laws 2009, ch. 128, § 4, effective January 1, 2010, repealed (f), which dealt with the responsibilities of
persons engaged in the business of renting rental vehicles.

The third 2009 amendment, by Laws 2009, ch. 183, § 1, effective July 1, 2009, added (a)(vii).

While none of the 2009 amendments gave effect to the others, all have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (b), inserted “and, for glider kit vehicles, the additional requirements contained in W.S.

31-2-112

.”

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (k), added the last sentence and (k)(i) through (k)(iii); in the introductory language of (y), added “suspend” following “cancel, revoke” and deleted “or from the records and prior experience of the department” in the third sentence.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in the second sentence of (s), added "or 39-17-306(f)" following "39-17-206(d)," "or alternative" preceding "fuels"; in the first sentence of (t),added "or 39-17-306(f)" following "39-17-206(d)" ;and made related changes.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i), (

l

), (v) or (x) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (y)(iii), see § 31-18-101(a)(xix).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Applicability of motor vehicle registration laws to corporation domiciled in state but having branch trucking bases in other states, 16 ALR2d 1414.

§ 31-18-202.
Reciprocal agreements and exemptions.

The department may negotiate reciprocal agreements with appropriate officials of any other jurisdiction, in which nonresidents of this state shall be exempt from Wyoming vehicle registration fees in exchange for equivalent exemptions from like fees imposed by the other jurisdictions on residents of this state.

The department shall determine from time to time and advise each Wyoming motor vehicle registration and fee collecting official or other person and each state agency charged with enforcing motor vehicle statutes of Wyoming of the name of each state contiguous to Wyoming which has granted or subsequently grants for the benefit of affected Wyoming motor vehicle owners reciprocal exemptions pursuant to W.S.

31-18-201

and subsection (a) of this section, together with the nature and extent of each reciprocal grant by the other state, and shall likewise advise of the name of each jurisdiction with which the department has entered into a reciprocal agreement together with the nature and extent of the reciprocal grants made.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 1; 1998, ch. 46, § 1.